Missouri, session 2026, SB1076.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 139.120, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 139.120,
to read as follows:
139.120. 1. (1) The collector or collector-treasurer
in a county having township organization shall diligently
endeavor and use all lawful means to collect all taxes which
they are required to collect in their respective counties,
and to that end they shall have the power to seize and sell
the goods and chattels of the person liable for taxes, in
the same manner as goods and chattels are or may be required
to be seized and sold under execution issued on judgments at
law[, and no property whatever shall be exempt from seizure
and sale for taxes due on lands or personal property;
provided, that].
(2) No such seizure or sale for taxes shall be made
until after the first day of October of each year, and the
collector or collector-treasurer shall not receive a credit
for delinquent taxes until the collector or collector-
treasurer shall have made affidavit that the collector or
collector-treasurer has been unable to find any personal
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1076 2
property out of which to make the taxes in each case so
returned delinquent; but no such seizure and sale of goods
shall be made until the collector or collector-treasurer has
made demand for the payment of the tax, either in person or
by deputy, to the party liable to pay the same, or by
leaving a written or printed notice at his place of abode
for that purpose, with some member of the family over
fifteen years of age.
2. Such seizure may be made at any time after the
first day of October, and before said taxes become
delinquent, or after they become delinquent; provided
further, that when any person owing personal tax removes
from one county in this state to another, it shall be the
duty of the county collector, or collector-treasurer as the
case may be, of the county from which such person shall
move, to send a tax bill to the sheriff of the county into
which such person may be found, and on receipt of the same
by said sheriff, it shall be the collector's or the
collector-treasurer's duty to proceed to collect said tax
bill in like manner as provided by law for the collection of
personal tax, for which the collector or the collector-
treasurer shall be allowed the same compensation as provided
by law in the collection of executions. It shall be the
duty of the sheriff in such case to make due return to the
collector or collector-treasurer of the county from whence
said tax bill was issued, with the money collected thereon.
3. (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to
the contrary, none of the following property shall be seized
for sale to collect taxes on such property solely because
the owner of such property owes taxes on such property:
(a) Personal property; or

SB 1076 3
(b) Real property classified as residential property
under Article X, Section 4(b) of the Constitution of
Missouri and used as the owner's primary residence
including, but not limited to, real property used as the
owner's primary residence when such property is held in the
name of a limited liability company and is used for farming
purposes.
(2) This subsection shall apply only to personal
property or real property described in subdivision (1) of
this section.
✓